Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 247 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Extension service" means the University of Kentucky Cooperative
Extension Service;
(b) "Farm land" means land that is part of a farming operation or business
enterprise engaged in the production of agricultural products, commodities,
or livestock and is operated by a person, legal entity, or joint operation that
is eligible to receive payments directly or indirectly under one (1) or more
United States Department of Agriculture programs;
(c) "Initiative" means the Kentucky Urban Farming Youth Initiative
established in this section;
(d) "Program" means any educational program that is part of the initiative;
and
(e) "Urban counties" means counties with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand (150,000) or more according to the most recent federal decennial
census.
(2) There is hereby established the Kentucky Urban Farming Youth Initiative, which
shall be administered by the University of Kentucky Cooperative Extension
Service and its individual offices within the Commonwealth as appropriate. The
extension service shall initiate a pilot program in one (1) or more individual
offices beginning August 1, 2025, and shall administer the initiative in all
appropriate offices throughout the Commonwealth beginning August 1, 2026.
(3) The initiative shall:
(a) Promote farming and the efficient use of land in urban counties;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/25/2024 12:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 376
(b) Educate program participants on all aspects of farming in an urban
environment and encourage other members of the community to begin and
to continue farming; and
(c) Provide a sufficient understanding of farming operations so that graduating
participants may obtain an agriculture sales tax exemption license number
in accordance with KRS 139.481 and subsequently operate successful,
small-scale farms within their communities.
(4) The length of each program term shall be one (1) year in duration, and each term
shall begin in January on a date specified by the extension service. Programs
shall be available to applicants at each extension service office located within or
serving an urban county of the Commonwealth. An office may work with an
existing state or local agricultural organization to better provide for the
administration of a program and the initiative.
(5) Each extension service office administering a program shall accept and review
applications from eligible applicants. Program participation shall be at the
discretion of each office and shall include as many participants as is practicable
on an annual basis. To be eligible to participate in a program, an applicant shall:
(a) Be at least six (6) years of age and no more than eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Have fully authorized access to no less than one-hundredth (0.01) of an
acre of farm land located within the jurisdiction of the extension service
office administering the program on which to farm;
(c) Identify a parent or legal guardian who shall provide assistance and
guidance for the applicant's participation in the program for the duration of
the term; and
(d) Be available to participate in the program for the full duration of the term.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/25/2024 12:52 PM Jacketed